examples/patterns/hyph-de-1901-joint.pat.txt
.aal1
.aar3
.ab3l
.ab3s2
.ack2
.ade2
.ad2r
.agen2
.ai4
.al4
.all2e
.alt3r
.alt3s
.alz2
.am4
.amt2s1
.an1
.an3d2
.angs4
.angst3
.an3i
.an3s
.ans2p
.anti3g
.an3z2
.ap1p
.ar4
.arm3ac
.art3ei
.arter4
.art5erh
.as2
.at4
.au2
.au4f3
.au3l
.aus1p
.aus5tes
.ax2
.är2
.ärsch3
.ät4
.ban4
.be1er
.ben2
.ber4
.berg3a
.berg5eb
.berg3r
.be7ringe
.bes4
.bi3na
.blau3
.bo2
.bol4
.bus5t
.ch4
.chef3
.dach1
.da1l
.darm1
.de2b
.dem1e
.de3mi
.den2
.de2pa
.de2pu
.de3ran
.der4en
.de1s
.de3se
.de3sk
.de1te
.di3el
.dien4e
.dien6st
.dienst7ad
.do2g
.do4m
.dorf1
.do2t
.eben5
.eber1
.eg2
.ehe3
.ei4gen
.ei4lau
.eil1t
.ei3sch
.ei4sp
.ei4s3t
.ei1z
.el4
.elb3s
.elch1
.em2a
.em4s
.en2d
.end1e
.en3dem
.en4d1r
.en2g
.enge4
.enn2
.enns3
.en2q
.en4t3
.er1
.er8brecht
.er4dar
.er3g
.er3ne
.ers4
.er8stein
.er8stritt.
.es2
.et4
.eu2k
.eu3t
.ex1t
.ex3te
.fach1
.fahl1
.fe4
.fel4
.fer2
.fi4
.fil4
.flug3
.fon2
.ga4
.gas1e
.gd2
.gege2
.ge3he
.ge1hu
.gel2
.gelb1
.geld1
.ge3lu
.ge3m
.gen2e
.gen2r
.gen3te
.ge1r2
.ge3re
.ge3rie
.ge3s4
.ge3t
.ge3u
.glas3
.go2
.gro4
.gs4
.guss1
.ha2
.hal4
.hals3
.han2
.hau4s
.haut1
.he4
.hef2
.hel2
.her5inn
.her6man
.heu1e
.hi4
.ho4
.hohl1
.holz1
.ide2
.ig2
.ih2
.il3
.il4b
.il4m
.imm2
.im1pe
.in1de
.in3die
.indi5ge
.in1e
.in1g
.ink2
.in4sel
.in3ser
.in1z
.is2a
.ka4
.kal2t
.kat1i
.kel4
.ker2
.ki4
.ko2b
.ko2l
.kom1
.kopf1
.kurz1
.la4
.lan4
.lär2
.le4
.lei4
.len2
.ler2
.li4
.licht7er8s
.lin2
.lit4
.lo4
.log3in
.lor2
.los3
.lut4
.ma4
.macht3
.mal4e
.man2
.me4
.mee2
.men2
.mess3u
.mi4
.min2
.mo4
.mus2
.na4
.nar4
.när2
.näs3
.ne2
.ner2
.ni4
.nie4
.no4
.not1t
.nus2
.nuss3
.ob1a
.obe4
.oben3
.ob1l
.och2
.of3fer
.of2fl
.ol4
.om2
.on2k
.or4
.oran2
.ort2
.orts3e
.os4
.ost3en
.ost1r
.ot1a
.öl3
.pa4
.papier5
.par4k
.par4m
.pat4
.pel2
.pen4
.per4l
.pest3
.pf4
.po2
.pol4s
.por4
.porte3
.po4s
.pre1t
.ra4
.rand1
.re1b
.reb3s
.re3cha
.rei4
.reis3t
.re1l
.re4lie
.re3m
.ren2
.rik2
.ro4
.rom2
.rom4a
.ror2
.rost1
.ruf3
.ruhr1
.run2
.runder6
.rücker6
.rühr1
.sa4
.sab2
.sal4
.san4
.sch4
.se4
.sen2
.ser4
.sig2
.so3g
.son2
.st4
.ste2
.sten2
.ster4
.such3e
.sucher6
.ta4
.tal2e
.tan4
.tank3l
.tat1u
.te4
.tei2
.tele3g
.tem4
.ter2
.test3
.tid1
.tie2
.tin2
.tit2
.to4
.tör1c
.tro2
.uh2
.ul2
.um1
.umer3
.un1a
.un1d
.un3g
.un1k
.un3n
.un3s
.un1z
.ur1
.urin1
.uro1
.ur3om
.ur3z
.us2
.ut2
.ve4
.ven2
.ver3
.wahl1
.weg5s
.wei2
.welter8e
.welter8k
.wer4
.wider3
.wie3f
.wil2
.wild1
.wo2h
.wort1
.zahn3
.ze4
.zel2
.zin4
aa4
a1ab
a1ace
aa5do
aa5ki
aale1
a1an
2a2ar
aar3a
aar3b
aar3d
aar3k2
aar3l
aar3r
aar3s
aar3ta
aar3th
aar3tr
aar3z
aa5se
aat1r
aat4s3
2a3au
a1ä
a2b
2a3bal
a4b1ar
ab1au
abau4t
ab1ä
ab2cha
1abde
ab1eb
4a3bec
abe1e
ab1eil
2abe2l
a4ben
aben1z
2aber
a3berg
ab1er4k
ab1er4r
ab1er2z
ab1ess
ab1eß
2abet
2abew
1abf
3abg
3abh
2abi4
a3b1ir
ab1it
1abk
ab1l
1ab3la
1ablä
2able
ab2lo
a4b3lö
1abn
ab2of
2abo2l
a4bon
abor3g
abor3s
4abot
ab1r
abra4
2abrö
2abrü
1absc
ab3s2i
1ab3s2p
abs4t4
1absta
ab3stu
ab1t
1abtei
3abtr
abu3b
2ab1ur
ab3us
2abü
1abw
2aby
1ab3z
2ac.
aca1
a1cen
3acet
2ach.
ach3a
2achb
ach6bars
2ache
ach3ec
ache3f
ach1ei
ach3erh
acher3k
ach3erl
ach3erw
2achf
ach1l
2ach3m
ach3n
ach1ob
ach3ö
2ach1r
achs4i
ach3sin
ach3spr
ach4tak
acht7ersc
ach2t1o
ach8traum
ach6trit
ach1uf
ach3ü
4achv
2ach1w
4ack.
ack1l
ack2mu
ack3sl
ack3sta
a2d
4ad.
1ada
ad2ab
ada4m
ad1ama
ad1an
3ad3ap
ad2ar3
a5dat
ad1au
2adav
1adä
ad3c
1add
2ade.
2adeg
ade2i
2aden
ade1ra
4ade1s2
ade3sp
2adf
2adh
4adi
adie4
a3dikt
3adj
ad2ke
ad3me
3admi
a3do
a4doc
2adp
2adq
adrat3
2ad1rec
ad1rei
a3drom
ad1run
2ad3s2
2ad2t1
adt3r
2a1e2
a2el
a3em
aeo3
aer2o
af1a
af2ak
a2fan
a2fau
2afe
af1ec
aff3ei
affel3e
af2fer
af1fes
2afi
afik1a
2af1l
af3le
2afo
a2foh
afo1s
af1ra
af1rä
af1re
af1rö
af3s2a
af3s2h
af2s1p
afs4t
2af2t
aft1a
aft1r
aft3re
af3ur
af3z
a2g
2ag.
2aga
ag1ab
ag1ad
ag1am
ag1ar
agas4
ag1au
a3gä
ag2d1
age1b
age1g
age1i
ag3eis
age2n
ag4er
2ages
a4ge2sa
age2s3p
age4spe
ag3esse
3aggr
2agl
ag1la
ag2lan
ag3lö
ag2me
a3gons
a3gor
a3gr
a4g3re
a4g3ri
a5gru
ag3s2ah
ags4eid
ag3sta
ag3ste
2agt
2ah.
2aha
a1han
a1hä
2ahe
ahe3in
ah1er4h
ahe1s
a1h2i
ah2j
ah2l
ahl3a
ahl1ei
ahl3erh
ahl3sz
ah2m
ah4n
ahner4e
a4hor
ah1os
a2h3ö
ah2r
ahr1a
ahr2e
ahr3ei
ahr3erl
ahre4s
ahr4tri
ah1se
ah2t3r
aht3s
ah1w
a3hy
ah3z
ai1a2
aib1l
ai1bu
ai1de
aid2s3
aien3
ai1f
ai1g2
aik2r
ai1ku
a2il
ai1la
ai1lä
ail3lis
ail3s
ail3t
ai3m2
2ain
ain2a
ai3nac
a1ind
ain2e
ain3f
a3in1g
ain3sp
ai3sc
ais2e2
ai3spe
a4it2
ai1ta
ai1ve
2ak.
2a3kam
2akar
ak4at
1akaz
a3kä
2akb
2akc
2akd
2ake
ak1ern
aket3z
aki3s
2akl
a2kn
2ako
a2kod
a2kok
a2kol
2a2kr
ak1rau
a3kre
ak1res
a3kri
3a4kro
2aks
ak3sh
2akta
2aktb
ak4te
akt2er
2aktik
akt1r
akts4
2aktsi
2aktsp
2aktst
2akul
2akun
2akur
4akü
1akz
4al.
al3ab
al1ac
al1af
al1ag
al1am
alami3
al1ana
al1anz
2al3arr
al1ass
2alat
alat3s
al3au
al1äm
al1är
alb3er4w
alb1l
alb3li
alb1re
alb1ru
alb3st
al1c
al2dac
alde2
al1di
al2dr
4ale
al1eb
al1ec
al3ef
al1eh
al1ei
a1leic
al3ein
a1lek
al1el
a3lenas
ale2p
al1epo
al1erb
al1erf
al1erh
al3erl
al1ert
ale4s
al1eu
al3fe
al2gli
1algo
a1lief
ali3l
a3l2imb
al1in
a1lip
al1kes
alk1le
1alkoh
al3kre
alk3s
al2ku
al3kü
all3ar
allen6ke
all5erfa
4allin
al1lip
al1lit
al2lok
al4lu
3almb
al3n
2alo
al1ob
a1loc
3aloe
4alog
al1orc
4aloz
a2l1ö
3alpe.
al3per
2alpr
2als.
al4sh
als4te
al3su
al4sum
al2tak
alt3alg
al2tat
alt3eig
alt3er5f
4alth
al1tim
alt1op
alt3reu
alt3ric
alt2se
alt4stü
al1tur
2alty
alu3f
alu3g
al3ur
alut3
al3ute
al2va
al2vi
4aly2
2alz
alz4erk
alzer4z
al2zw
am2
2am.
a2ma
ama3b
2a3mac
2aman2
2amar
ama1re
a4mask
a3max
ama2z
2amä
am3ba
am3be
am3d
2ame.
a1mee
am3ele
amer2a
am3erf
3ameri
2amf
a3mir
2amis
a3miss
ami3t2a
2amk
2am3l
2ammal
amme4
2amml
am4mo
2ammt
amo2
a2mol
a4mö
amp2
2ampe.
2ampen
amper2
2am4po
am3sp
am3str
1amt.
amt3a
amt1ä
2amtem
amt3ern
amt1r
2amu
am3unt
a3mü
2anab
an2a1c
an2ad
an3ae
an2alk
anama1
an1ame
2anan
2anas
an1asc
an4atm
1anb
2anc
an2cho
an2d
4and.
an3d2ac
and3ei
ande4l
ande2s1
and1ri
an4drom
and3rü
4ands
and4sas
and6spas
and6s5paß
4andt
2andu
and1ur
2ane2
an3ec
an1eu
1anf
an3fe
2anfi
anf3la
anf2t
anf2u
4ang.
an2g1ar
an3gau
3angeb
an3geh
ang3ei
ang3erf
ang3erz
2angh
2an2gie
ang1la
2an2go
ang3ra
1angri
4angs.
ang1th
1anh
2a2n2i
4anie
3anil
3anim
an3ind
an3io
anis2
a3niv
2ank.
ank1ak
ank1an
3ankä
an2ki
an3kis
ank1no
ank1ra
ank1rä
2anks
ank3se
2ankt2
1anl
1anmu
2ann
3anna
3annä
an2net
an2no
ann4sto
a2no
a4nom
2anö
1an3r
2anrö
2ans.
2ansh
an3skr
ans1pa
an3sta
ans4te
an3s2z
2ant.
an4tag
ant3ar
2ante.
1antei
2antem
an2ten
3antenn
2anter
2antes
ant4g
an2th
an3thei
an4t2i
anton2
3antr
1antw
2anu
anu3s
a1nü
2anv
1anw
2anz.
2anzb
1anzei
an2zen
2anzf
2anzg
anz1in
2anzk
2anzl
2anzp
2anzr
2anzs
2anzt
1anzü
2anzv
2anzw
an2zwa
an2zwi
2anzy
2ao
ao1n
a1op
a1or2
ao5ts
a1ö
2ap.
2apa
a1pä
2a2pe
ap2f
1apfel
a1pfl
a2pi
a2p2l
apo3k
apo1s
a2pot
3appa
3appl
2a1pr
3a2pri
ap2sc
ap2si
ap1to
a1pul
ar2
2ar.
ar3abf
ar3abt
ara3go
a1rah
ar3al
ara1m
2aran
ar3ang
ar3ans
ar3anz
ara1p
ar3ap1p
2ar3ar
a2ras
ar3ast
ar5au
ara1v
ar3är
1arb
2arb.
4arb1a
ar4bare
2arbek
2arben
ar3ber
4ar3bes
4arbi
ar3bie
arb1in
ar3bis
4arbl
2arbo
2arbr
2arb3s
2arbt
arb1th
2ar3bu
3arc
4ard
ar3d2am
ar3dar
ar3dat
arde2i
arden1
ar1des
ardi4
ar3do
2are
are1b
a1rec
ar3eff
are3g
are1h
ar3ehr
4ar3ei
are4n
aren4er
aren3zi
are1r2a
arer2e
ar3erh
ar3erl
ar3ert
are3s
a1rest
ar4et
are1te
are3u
2arf
ar3fi
ar3fl
arf1ra
ar3fu
ar5fü
ar3ge
arg4o
ar3gr
arg4s
ar3gü
2ar5h
2ari
ari4at
arie1c
ar3im
ar1ini
arin3st
ar3int
ar3inw
ar4is
a1riv
ark3amt
ar4k1ar
ark3aue
ark2i
ark1l
ar3kn
2arko
ar4kor
ar4kri
ark3sa
arma3g
ar3mal
ar3mang
arma3sc
arm2ä
ar3min
ar3mit
2armo
ar3nei
arn2el
ar3ni
ar3no
ar3ob
ar3od
ar3of
ar3op
ar3or
aro2t
a1rot.
2ar3p
ar4pat
2arr
arr1ad
ar3rak
ar4ran
2ars.
2arsa
ars2h
2ar3si
4arst
ar3sta
ar3su
ar5tag
ar5tar
ar3tat
art2e
artei5le
art3erl
ar3tex
art4hä
art2i
ar4tig
artin2
2arto
art3ram
2arts
art2sp
2aru
ar3uf
ar3uh
ar3um
a2r3ü
4ar3v
2arw
ary1l
2arze
ar5zei
arz2t
arz1w
a2s
as3ab
a3sai
as3au
a4sche
2ase
a3se2d
a3see
as1ef
a3seg
a3seh
a3sek
as1e2m
as1ent
aser1t
ase4t
as1eta
a3seu
as1im
a4sin
asis1
as2k
as3kan
aska1s
as3kl
as3ko
as3kr
as3ku
as2ma
as3mu
a4s3n
as1of
as1or
as1pa
3a4s2ph
as1pr
as2s
assa3b
ass2e
ass3ei
assen3t
ass1p
ass3ti
ass3to
as3str
as3stu
a4sten
as3tep
2asti
ast3orc
a3str
as4trau
ast3räu
as4t1re
as3tur
as3tür
1asy
aß1er
2a2t
4at.
4ata1
at1ab
at1akt
at1an
at3ant
at1apf
at3ar
at2as
a3tass
at1au
at1ä
at2c
at2e
a3tec
a3tee
at3eig
ate3le
ate4n
ater1n
ater3s
at4es
a3tex
4atf
4atg
at2h
3athl
4ati4
atie3b
atien2
atinen3
at1ini
a3tit
at2la
3at2m
4atma
4atmus
3ato2m
a3ton
ato4r
ator3g
a3torh
at1ort
ato5s
a3tow
at1ö
4atp
at1rä
at1re
at1rom
a3tru
at3rü
4at2s
at4sche
ats1p
at2t
3attac
att1ad
att1ak
at6tec
att4hä
att1rä
at3tre
at3tri
att3s2
a3tub
at3w
at2z
atz1er
atz1i
atz1th
atz1w
a2u
2au.
2au1a
auan3
4aub
aub1al
aub3b
au1bel
au2bri
4auc
au3char
auchs4p
auch3ta
au3co
au1da
au3deg
au2dr
au1du
2aue2
au1eb
au1el
au2er
auer3ö
au1esc
au2fa
auf1an
3aufber
2aufe.
2aufeh
auf1er
1aufn
auft2
2auft.
au1fu
5aufzeic
2aug
au3g2ar
4augeh
au1gel
au1gem
aug4en
au1ges
au3gla
au1go
au4gu
2auh
au1he
au1hi
auh1r
2aui
au3in
au1kl
au1l
aul3ti
4aum
au2mal
aum1er1
au1mi
aum3m
au2m1o
aum1p
aum3s4
au1mu
4aun
aun2a3
aun2e
2aup4
2aur2
au1rin
au1ro
au1rö
au2s
aus1ah
aus3an
4ausc
1ausd
au3see
2ausen
aus3erp
1ausf
1ausg
aus3k
1ausl
1ausr
1auss
auss2e
aus3s4t
aus3t
2auste
aus1ti
aust2o
1ausü
3ausz
auß2e
2aut.
au1tal
au1tan
2aute
aut3erh
au3term
au1tie
1au4to
aut2o3f
aut3roc
au4trö
2auts
aut1t
au1tu
aut3z
2auu
2auw
2auz
auz2w
2a1ü
avel1
2aw
a1wä
a1we
a1wo
a1wu
ax2am
axis3
axi3v
2axo
ay1o
ay3s
ay1t
az2
a3zei
azi3g
azin3s
azi3te
a3zu
ä1am4
ä3ar
ä4b
äbel1
äb1l
äb2s
äche1e
äch1l
äch4s
äch2t
äch2z
äck2e
äck1n
äde4
ä1des
ädi4
äd1ia
ädis2
ä2dr
äd2s
äd4t
ädt4l
ä1em
ä1ex
äf2f
äff3l
äf1l
äf3le
äf2s
äf2t
äft4s3
ä2g
äge1i
äge2r
äge3s
äg1l
äg2n
äg3nis
ägs4
äg3ste
äg3str
1ägy
äh1a
2ähe
ähi2
ähl1a
ähl2e4
ähl3ebe
2ähm
äh2me
äh2n
äh3na
2ähr
äh1ro
2ähs4
2äht
äh3tr
äh1w
2äi
ä1im
ä1j
2ä2k
äl2
ä1la
älbe2
äl3c
äll1a
älm4
älp1
älte3l
ä1lu
ä2m
2äml
äm2m
2ämp
äm2s
ämt2e
ä2n4
2än.
ä3na
än5c
2ä4ne
änen1
äne3s
änf3l
änft2
2änge
änge2r
2ängl
2äni
änk2e
änk1l
äns1c
äns2e
änse3h
2änz
änz3l
äo1
äon4
äos2
äp2
ä1pa
äps1c
ä1pu
1äq
2är.
är3a2
är1ä
ärb1l
är1c
är1ei
är1el
ären2e
är2f2
är3fl
är2g
är3ga
är2k2
är4ke
ärkom1
äro2
är1of3
är1op
2ärö
är3p
2ärs
är2sc
är2si
är2sz
ärt2e
ärt4n
ärt2s3
är2z
är3zi
äs2
ä2s3a
ä2sc
äse1b
äse3g
äse1h
äse3l
äsen2
äse3ref
äser4ei
äser2i
äse1t
ä1si
äs3ko
äskopf3
ä3skr
äs3l
äs3m
ä2so
ä2s3p
äs4s
äss1c
äss2e
äss3erk
ä2s4t
äste3m
äß1erk
äß2r
ät2
ät3a
äte1h
äte1i
ätel4
äte1s
ät3he
ät3l
ät3n
ät3ob
ät3r
äts1i
äts1p
äts3t
ät3w
ät3zei
ä2u2
äub1l
äude1
1äug
äu3h
2äul
äu3li
äum1p
äumpf4
äum2s5
2äun
äun2e
2äur2
äure1
äu4s
äus2e
1äus4s
äuss1c
1äuß
äut4e
ä1v
1äx
ä1z
1ba
b1abs
3baby
bacht4e
backs4
b2ada
bad2m
b1adr
4b1af
bag2
3bah
bak1i
bak1l
bal2
bal3at
bal3da
4bale
bal3lö
bal4s
4b1am
ban2
b2ana
b2and
band1a
ban4e
b1ang
ban3ge
4bani
3ban4k
bank1a
4banl
4b1an3s
ban3tr
b1an3z
2bap
2barb
bar4bi
2bard
2barf
2barg
bar3ga
2barh
2bari
bar3ins
bar3k
2barki
2barko
2barkr
2barl
2barn
2barp
2bar3sc
2barsj
2barsk
4barsta
4barstä
2barv
2barw
2barz2
bar3zw
3b2a4s4
bast2
3baß
3bata
bat3ent
2batj
bat2o
3bau
bau1b
bau1d
bau3erg
bau3er4l
bauer4s
bau1fe
b2aufo
bau1g
bau1k
bau3men
bau1r
bau3s
baus4k
baus4t
bau1ta
bau3z
2ba1w
3baz
1bä
3b2äc
3b2är
3b2äs
2b1b2
bbau3er
b2bel
bbe2n
bben3s
b3be4p
b6by
2b1c
bch2
4b1d2
bde1s
2be.
be3a
3beam
beb2
2bebeg
be1bel
be1ber
2bebet
1bebt
1be2c
3beck
3be1d
bee2
be1eh
be1en
be2erk
be1erl
be1ert
be1eta
3beete
be3f2
2befäl
be1g2
be3ga
2begel
1begl
2bego
1be1h4
be3he
3behö
1bei
5bei.
bei3b
b1eier
bei1f2
bei1g
3beih
beik2
bei1l2
bei3m
b1eime
b2ein
be1ind
be1in2h
bei1r
bei3s4
beit2s
bei1z
beki3
be2kis
3bekl
2bekr
be3las
bel3b
bel1d
be1le4
2bele.
bel1en
bel3f
bel2i
2be3lis
bel1k
bel3lam
4beln
be2l3ö
2bels
bel3sz
2belt
bel1ta
be2lut
4belw
be1m
be3me
b1emp
2ben
ben3ar
be2nä
ben3dar
b2ene
3bened
be1nei
be1ni
ben3k
ben1n
beno2
be2nor
benst2
b1entb
ben3ti
ben3t2r
b1ents
ben3un
benz2
3benzo
2bep
be1q
4ber.
be1ra4
2ber3b
2ber3d2
be1re
ber4ei.
ber3eiw
be2ren
2berf
1berg.
4berh
ber4hab
be1rie
2berin
ber4in.
be5ringt
be1rip
2beris
ber3iss
ber2ke
ber5kr
2berm
ber3mi
2bern
b1ernt
2bero
